Utah statutes.
26-18-101.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Appropriate and medically necessary" means, regarding drug prescribing,
dispensing, and patient usage, that it is in conformity with the criteria and
standards developed in accordance with this part.
(2)  "Board" means the Drug Utilization Review Board created in Section
26-18-102.
(3)  "Compendia" means resources widely accepted by the medical profession in
the efficacious use of drugs, including "American Hospital Formulary Services
Drug Information," "U.S. Pharmacopeia - Drug Information," "A.M.A. Drug
Evaluations," peer-reviewed medical literature, and information provided by
manufacturers of drug products.
(4)  "Counseling" means the activities conducted by a pharmacist to inform
Medicaid recipients about the proper use of drugs, as required by the board
under this part.
(5)  "Criteria" means those predetermined and explicitly accepted elements
used to measure drug use on an ongoing basis in order to determine if the use
is appropriate, medically necessary, and not likely to result in adverse
medical outcomes.
(6)  "Drug-disease contraindications" means that the therapeutic effect of a
drug is adversely altered by the presence of another disease condition.
(7)  "Drug-interactions" means that two or more drugs taken by a recipient
lead to clinically significant toxicity that is characteristic of one or any
of the drugs present, or that leads to interference with the effectiveness of
one or any of the drugs.
(8)  "Drug Utilization Review" or "DUR" means the program designed to measure
and assess, on a retrospective and prospective basis, the proper use of
outpatient drugs in the Medicaid program.
(9)  "Intervention" means a form of communication utilized by the board with a
prescriber or pharmacist to inform about or influence prescribing or
dispensing practices.
(10)  "Overutilization" or "underutilization" means the use of a drug in such
quantities that the desired therapeutic goal is not achieved.
(11)  "Pharmacist" means a person licensed in this state to engage in the
practice of pharmacy under Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act.
(12)  "Physician" means a person licensed in this state to practice medicine
and surgery under  Section 58-67-301 or osteopathic medicine under Section
58-68-301.
(13)  "Prospective DUR" means that part of the drug utilization review program
that occurs before a drug is dispensed, and that is designed to screen for
potential drug therapy problems based on explicit and predetermined criteria
and standards.
(14)  "Retrospective DUR" means that part of the drug utilization review
program that assesses or measures drug use based on an historical review of
drug use data against predetermined and explicit criteria and standards, on an
ongoing basis with professional input.
(15)  "Standards" means the acceptable range of deviation from the criteria
that reflects local medical practice and that is tested on the Medicaid
recipient database.
(16)  "SURS" means the Surveillance Utilization Review System of the Medicaid
program.
(17)  "Therapeutic appropriateness" means drug prescribing and dispensing
based on rational drug therapy that is consistent with criteria and standards.
(18)  "Therapeutic duplication" means prescribing and dispensing the same drug
or two or more drugs from the same therapeutic class where periods of drug
administration overlap and where that practice is not medically indicated.
